Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 70

Uniform Principal And Income Act

Publisher's Notes. Former Chapter 70 was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 647, § 603, effective January 1, 2000. The chapter was dervied from the following sources:

28-70-101. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-601.

28-70-103. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-603.

28-70-105. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-605.

28-70-107. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-607; Acts 1993, No. 236, § 1.

28-70-109. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-609.

28-70-111. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-611.

28-70-113. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-613.

28-70-115. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-615.

28-70-117. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-616n.

Revised Uniform Principal and Income Act (U.L.A.) § 19, which was not adopted in Arkansas, was an effective date provision.

For Comments regarding the Uniform Principal and Income Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

As to the effective date of this chapter, see §28-70-604.

Subchapter 1

— Definitions and Fiduciary Duties

28-70-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Principal and Income Act.”

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 101.

28-70-102. Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Accounting period” means a calendar year unless another 12-month period is selected by a fiduciary. The term includes a portion of a calendar year or other 12-month period that begins when an income interest begins or ends when an income interest ends.

“Beneficiary” includes, in the case of a decedent's estate, an heir, legatee, and devisee and, in the case of a trust, an income beneficiary and a remainder beneficiary.

“Fiduciary” means a personal representative or a trustee. The term includes an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special administrator, and a person performing substantially the same function.

“Income” means money or property that a fiduciary receives as current return from a principal asset. The term includes a portion of receipts from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a principal asset, to the extent provided in § 28-70-401 et seq.

“Income beneficiary” means a person to whom net income of a trust is or may be payable.

“Income interest” means the right of an income beneficiary to receive all or part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require it to be distributed or authorize it to be distributed in the trustee's discretion.

“Mandatory income interest” means the right of an income beneficiary to receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.

“Net income” means the total receipts allocated to income during an accounting period minus the disbursements made from income during the period, plus or minus transfers under this chapter to or from income during the period.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal” means property held in trust for distribution to a remainder beneficiary when the trust terminates.

“Remainder beneficiary” means a person entitled to receive principal when an income interest ends.

“Terms of a trust” means the manifestation of the intent of a settlor or decedent with respect to the trust, expressed in a manner that admits of its proof in a judicial proceeding, whether by written or spoken words or by conduct.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.

Cited: Peek v. Simmons First Nat'l Bank, 309 Ark. 294, 832 S.W.2d 458 (1992).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 102.

28-70-103. Fiduciary duties — General principles.

In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and income, and with respect to any matter within the scope of § 28-70-201 et seq. and § 28-70-301 et seq., a fiduciary:

shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust or the will, even if there is a different provision in this chapter;

may administer a trust or estate by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust or the will, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this chapter;

shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with this chapter if the terms of the trust or the will do not contain a different provision or do not give the fiduciary a discretionary power of administration; and

shall add a receipt or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent that the terms of the trust and this chapter do not provide a rule for allocating the receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.

In exercising the power to adjust under § 28-70-104(a) or a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of this chapter, whether granted by the terms of a trust, a will, or this chapter, a fiduciary shall administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent that the terms of the trust or the will clearly manifest an intention that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries. A determination in accordance with this chapter is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries.

the nature, purpose, and expected duration of the trust;

the intent of the settlor;

the identity and circumstances of the beneficiaries;

the needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation and appreciation of capital;

the assets held in the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, or real property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor;

the net amount allocated to income under the other sections of this chapter and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

the actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation; and

the anticipated tax consequences of an adjustment.

A trustee may not make an adjustment:

that diminishes the income interest in a trust that requires all of the income to be paid at least annually to a surviving spouse and for which an estate tax or gift tax marital deduction would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to make the adjustment;

that reduces the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person transfers property with the intent to qualify for a gift tax exclusion;

that changes the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

from any amount that is permanently set aside for charitable purposes under a will or the terms of a trust unless both income and principal are so set aside;

if possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes an individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for income tax purposes, and the individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

if possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes all or part of the trust assets to be included for estate tax purposes in the estate of an individual who has the power to remove a trustee or appoint a trustee, or both, and the assets would not be included in the estate of the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

if the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or

if the trustee is not a beneficiary, but the adjustment would benefit the trustee directly or indirectly.

If subsection (c)(5), (6), (7), or (8) applies to a trustee and there is more than one trustee, a cotrustee to whom the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the trust.

A trustee may release the entire power conferred by subsection (a) or may release only the power to adjust from income to principal or the power to adjust from principal to income if the trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause a result described in subsection (c)(1) through (6) or (c)(8) or if the trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (c). The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

Terms of a trust that limit the power of a trustee to make an adjustment between principal and income do not affect the application of this section unless it is clear from the terms of the trust that the terms are intended to deny the trustee the power of adjustment conferred by subsection (a).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 103.

28-70-104. Trustee's power to adjust.

A trustee may adjust between principal and income to the extent the trustee considers necessary if the trustee invests and manages trust assets as a prudent investor, the terms of the trust describe the amount that may or must be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust's income, and the trustee determines, after applying the rules in §28-70-103(a), that the trustee is unable to comply with §28-70-103(b).

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by subsection (a), a trustee shall consider all factors relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries, including the following factors to the extent they are relevant:

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 104; 2005, No. 1962, § 118.

Subchapter 2

— Decedent's Estate or Terminating Income Interest

28-70-201. Determination and distribution of net income.

After a decedent dies, in the case of an estate, or after an income interest in a trust ends, the following rules apply:

A fiduciary of an estate or of a terminating income interest shall determine the amount of net income and net principal receipts received from property specifically given to a beneficiary under the rules in § 28-70-301 et seq., § 28-70-401 et seq., and § 28-70-501 et seq. which apply to trustees and the rules in paragraph (5). The fiduciary shall distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary who is to receive the specific property.

A fiduciary shall determine the remaining net income of a decedent's estate or a terminating income interest under the rules in § 28-70-301 et seq., § 28-70-401 et seq., and § 28-70-501 et seq. which apply to trustees and by:

including in net income all income from property used to discharge liabilities;

paying from income or principal, in the fiduciary's discretion, fees of attorneys, accountants, and fiduciaries; court costs and other expenses of administration; and interest on death taxes, but the fiduciary may pay those expenses from income of property passing to a trust for which the fiduciary claims an estate tax marital or charitable deduction only to the extent that the payment of those expenses from income will not cause the reduction or loss of the deduction; and

paying from principal all other disbursements made or incurred in connection with the settlement of a decedent's estate or the winding up of a terminating income interest, including debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, family allowances, and death taxes and related penalties that are apportioned to the estate or terminating income interest by the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law.

A fiduciary shall distribute to a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount outright the interest or any other amount provided by the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law from net income determined under paragraph (2) or from principal to the extent that net income is insufficient. If a beneficiary is to receive a pecuniary amount outright from a trust after an income interest ends and no interest or other amount is provided for by the terms of the trust or applicable law, the fiduciary shall distribute the interest or other amount to which the beneficiary would be entitled under applicable law if the pecuniary amount were required to be paid under a will.

A fiduciary shall distribute the net income remaining after distributions required by paragraph (3) in the manner described in § 28-70-202 to all other beneficiaries, including a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount in trust, even if the beneficiary holds an unqualified power to withdraw assets from the trust or other presently exercisable general power of appointment over the trust.

A fiduciary may not reduce principal or income receipts from property described in paragraph (1) because of a payment described in § 28-70-501 or § 28-70-502 to the extent that the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law requires the fiduciary to make the payment from assets other than the property or to the extent that the fiduciary recovers or expects to recover the payment from a third party. The net income and principal receipts from the property are determined by including all of the amounts the fiduciary receives or pays with respect to the property, whether those amounts accrued or became due before, on, or after the date of a decedent's death or an income interest's terminating event, and by making a reasonable provision for amounts that the fiduciary believes the estate or terminating income interest may become obligated to pay after the property is distributed.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 201.

28-70-202. Distribution to residuary and remainder beneficiaries.

Each beneficiary described in § 28-70-201(4) is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary's fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of the distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets to beneficiaries to whom this section applies, each beneficiary, including one who does not receive part of the distribution, is entitled, as of each distribution date, to the net income the fiduciary has received after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date but has not distributed as of the current distribution date.

In determining a beneficiary's share of net income, the following rules apply:

The beneficiary is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before the distribution date, including assets that later may be sold to meet principal obligations.

The beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets must be calculated without regard to property specifically given to a beneficiary and property required to pay pecuniary amounts not in trust.

The beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets must be calculated on the basis of the aggregate value of those assets as of the distribution date without reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation.

The distribution date for purposes of this section may be the date as of which the fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if that date is reasonably near the date on which assets are actually distributed.

If a fiduciary does not distribute all of the collected but undistributed net income to each person as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall maintain appropriate records showing the interest of each beneficiary in that net income.

A trustee may apply the rules in this section, to the extent that the trustee considers it appropriate, to net gain or loss realized after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date from the disposition of a principal asset if this section applies to the income from the asset.

on the date it is transferred to the trust in the case of an asset that is transferred to a trust during the transferor's life;

on the date of a testator's death in the case of an asset that becomes subject to a trust by reason of a will, even if there is an intervening period of administration of the testator's estate; or

on the date of an individual's death in the case of an asset that is transferred to a fiduciary by a third party because of the individual's death.

Distributions of net income from a trust were contingent on the trust producing income, but contingent interests of a debtor at the time of his bankruptcy filing were property of the bankruptcy estate; under federal and Arkansas law, debtor's interest in the net income from the trust would be property of her bankruptcy estate under 11 U.S.C.S. § 541(a)(1) unless an exception applied.Wetzel v. Regions Bank, 649 F.3d 831 (8th Cir. 2011).

money received from an entity that is a regulated investment company or a real estate investment trust if the money distributed is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes.

Money is not received in partial liquidation, nor may it be taken into account under subsection (d)(2), to the extent that it does not exceed the amount of income tax that a trustee or beneficiary must pay on taxable income of the entity that distributes the money.

A trustee may rely upon a statement made by an entity about the source or character of a distribution if the statement is made at or near the time of distribution by the entity's board of directors or other person or group of persons authorized to exercise powers to pay money or transfer property comparable to those of a corporation's board of directors.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 202.

Subchapter 3

— Apportionment at Beginning and End of Income Interest

28-70-301. When right to income begins and ends.

An income beneficiary is entitled to net income from the date on which the income interest begins. An income interest begins on the date specified in the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the date an asset becomes subject to a trust or successive income interest.

An asset becomes subject to a trust:

An asset becomes subject to a successive income interest on the day after the preceding income interest ends, as determined under subsection (d), even if there is an intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding income interest.

An income interest ends on the day before an income beneficiary dies or another terminating event occurs, or on the last day of a period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may distribute income.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 301.

28-70-302. Apportionment of receipts and disbursements when decedent dies or income interest begins.

A trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement other than one to which §28-70-201(1) applies to principal if its due date occurs before a decedent dies in the case of an estate or before an income interest begins in the case of a trust or successive income interest.

A trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement to income if its due date occurs on or after the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins and it is a periodic due date. An income receipt or disbursement must be treated as accruing from day to day if its due date is not periodic or it has no due date. The portion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins must be allocated to principal, and the balance must be allocated to income.

An item of income or an obligation is due on the date the payer is required to make a payment. If a payment date is not stated, there is no due date for the purposes of this chapter. Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which §28-70-401 applies are deemed to be due on the date fixed by the entity for determining who is entitled to receive the distribution or, if no date is fixed, on the declaration date for the distribution. A due date is periodic for receipts or disbursements that must be paid at regular intervals under a lease or an obligation to pay interest or if an entity customarily makes distributions at regular intervals.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 302.

28-70-303. Apportionment when income interest ends.

In this section, “undistributed income” means net income received before the date on which an income interest ends. The term does not include an item of income or expense that is due or accrued or net income that has been added or is required to be added to principal under the terms of the trust.

When a mandatory income interest ends, the trustee shall pay to a mandatory income beneficiary who survives that date, or the estate of a deceased mandatory income beneficiary whose death causes the interest to end, the beneficiary's share of the undistributed income that is not disposed of under the terms of the trust unless the beneficiary has an unqualified power to revoke more than 5 percent of the trust immediately before the income interest ends. In the latter case, the undistributed income from the portion of the trust that may be revoked must be added to principal.

When a trustee's obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust's assets ends, the trustee shall prorate the final payment if and to the extent required by applicable law to accomplish a purpose of the trust or its settlor relating to income, gift, estate, or other tax requirements.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 303.

Subchapter 4

— Allocation of Receipts During Administration of Trust

28-70-102. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-602.

28-70-104. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-604.

28-70-106. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-606.

28-70-108. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-608.

28-70-110. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-610.

28-70-112. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-612.

28-70-114. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-614.

28-70-116. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-616.

28-70-118. Acts 1971, No. 318, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-616n.